ru_RU.aff
SFX Y   раться рёшься       [^бд]раться
SFX Y   раться рётся        [^бд]раться
SFX Y   раться рётесь       [^бд]раться
SFX Y   раться рёмся        [^бд]раться
SFX Y   раться ерутся       [бд]раться
SFX Y   раться ерусь        [бд]раться
SFX Y   раться ерешься      [бд]раться
SFX Y   раться ерется       [бд]раться
SFX Y   раться еретесь      [бд]раться
SFX Y   раться еремся       [бд]раться
SFX Y   раться ерёшься      [бд]раться
SFX Y   раться ерётся       [бд]раться
SFX Y   раться ерётесь      [бд]раться
SFX Y   раться ерёмся       [бд]раться
SFX Y   рать рут          [^бд]рать
SFX Y   рать ру           [^бд]рать
SFX Y   рать решь         [^бд]рать
SFX Y   рать рете         [^бд]рать
SFX Y   рать рет          [^бд]рать
SFX Y   рать рем          [^бд]рать
SFX Y   рать рёшь         [^бд]рать
SFX Y   рать рёте         [^бд]рать
SFX Y   рать рёт          [^бд]рать
SFX Y   рать рём          [^бд]рать
SFX Y   рать ерут         [бд]рать
SFX Y   рать еру          [бд]рать
SFX Y   рать ерешь        [бд]рать
SFX Y   рать ерете        [бд]рать
SFX Y   рать ерет         [бд]рать
SFX Y   рать ерем         [бд]рать
SFX Y   рать ерёшь        [бд]рать
SFX Y   рать ерёте        [бд]рать
SFX Y   рать ерёт         [бд]рать
SFX Y   рать ерём         [бд]рать
SFX Y   яться нутся        мяться
SFX Y   яться нусь         мяться
SFX Y   яться нешься       мяться
SFX Y   яться нется        мяться
SFX Y   яться нетесь       мяться
SFX Y   яться немся        мяться
SFX Y   яться нёшься       мяться
SFX Y   яться нётся        мяться
SFX Y   яться нётесь       мяться
SFX Y   яться нёмся        мяться
SFX Y   ять  нут          мять
SFX Y   ять  ну           мять
SFX Y   ять  нешь         мять
SFX Y   ять  нете         мять
SFX Y   ять  нет          мять
SFX Y   ять  нем          мять
SFX Y   ять  нёшь         мять
SFX Y   ять  нёте         мять
SFX Y   ять  нёт          мять
SFX Y   ять  нём          мять
SFX Y   наться онятся       гнаться
SFX Y   наться онишься      гнаться
SFX Y   наться онится       гнаться
SFX Y   наться онитесь      гнаться
SFX Y   наться онимся       гнаться
SFX Y   наться онюсь        гнаться
SFX Y   нать онят         гнать
SFX Y   нать онишь        гнать
SFX Y   нать оните        гнать
SFX Y   нать онит         гнать
SFX Y   нать оним         гнать
SFX Y   нать оню          гнать
SFX Y   каться чутся        [^с]каться
SFX Y   каться чусь         [^с]каться
SFX Y   каться чешься       [^с]каться
SFX Y   каться чется        [^с]каться
SFX Y   каться четесь       [^с]каться
SFX Y   каться чемся        [^с]каться
SFX Y   кать чут          [^с]кать
SFX Y   кать чу           [^с]кать
SFX Y   кать чешь         [^с]кать
SFX Y   кать чете         [^с]кать
SFX Y   кать чет          [^с]кать
SFX Y   кать чем          [^с]кать
SFX Y   ить  ешь          лить
SFX Y   ить  ете          лить
SFX Y   ить  ет           лить
SFX Y   ить  ем           лить
SFX Y   ить  ют           лить
SFX Y   ить  ю            лить
SFX Y   и    ут           расти
SFX Y   и    у            расти
SFX Y   и    ешь          расти
SFX Y   и    ете          расти
SFX Y   и    ет           расти
SFX Y   и    ем           расти
SFX Y   и    ёшь          расти
SFX Y   и    ёте          расти
SFX Y   и    ёт           расти
SFX Y   и    ём           расти
SFX Y   хаться шутся        хаться
SFX Y   хаться шусь         хаться
SFX Y   хаться шешься       хаться
SFX Y   хаться шется        хаться
SFX Y   хаться шетесь       хаться
SFX Y   хаться шемся        хаться
SFX Y   хать шут          хать
SFX Y   хать шу           хать
SFX Y   хать шешь         хать
SFX Y   хать шете         хать
SFX Y   хать шет          хать
SFX Y   хать шем          хать
SFX Y   еться ятся         [дрт]еться
SFX Y   еться люсь         петься
SFX Y   еться ишься        [дрт]еться
SFX Y   еться ится         [дрт]еться
SFX Y   еться итесь        [дрт]еться
SFX Y   еться имся         [дрт]еться
SFX Y   еться юсь          реться
SFX Y   еть  ят           [дмнпрст]еть
SFX Y   еть  лю           петь
SFX Y   еть  ишь          [дмнпрст]еть
SFX Y   еть  ите          [дмнпрст]еть
SFX Y   еть  ит           [дмнпрст]еть
SFX Y   еть  им           [дмнпрст]еть
SFX Y   еть  ю            реть
SFX Y   есть тут          честь
SFX Y   есть ту           честь
SFX Y   есть тешь         честь
SFX Y   есть тете         честь
SFX Y   есть тет          честь
SFX Y   есть тем          честь
SFX Y   есть тёшь         честь
SFX Y   есть тёте         честь
SFX Y   есть тёт          честь
SFX Y   есть тём          честь
SFX Y   есть ядут         сесть
SFX Y   есть яду          сесть
SFX Y   есть ядешь        сесть
SFX Y   есть ядете        сесть
SFX Y   есть ядет         сесть
SFX Y   есть ядем         сесть
SFX Y   деться жусь         деться
SFX Y   деть жу           деть
SFX Y   аться утся         рваться
SFX Y   аться утся         осаться
SFX Y   аться усь          рваться
SFX Y   аться усь          осаться
SFX Y   аться ятся         спаться
SFX Y   аться люсь         спаться
SFX Y   аться ишься        жаться
SFX Y   аться ишься        спаться
SFX Y   аться ится         жаться
SFX Y   аться ится         спаться
SFX Y   аться итесь        жаться
SFX Y   аться итесь        спаться
SFX Y   аться имся         жаться
SFX Y   аться имся         спаться
SFX Y   аться ешься        рваться
SFX Y   аться ешься        осаться
SFX Y   аться ется         рваться
SFX Y   аться ется         осаться
SFX Y   аться етесь        рваться
SFX Y   аться етесь        осаться
SFX Y   аться емся         рваться
SFX Y   аться емся         осаться
SFX Y   аться ёшься        рваться
SFX Y   аться ёшься        осаться
SFX Y   аться ётся         рваться
SFX Y   аться ётся         осаться
SFX Y   аться ётесь        рваться
SFX Y   аться ётесь        осаться
SFX Y   аться ёмся         рваться
SFX Y   аться ёмся         осаться
SFX Y   ать  ут           рвать
SFX Y   ать  ут           осать
SFX Y   ать  у            рвать
SFX Y   ать  у            осать
SFX Y   ать  ят           спать
SFX Y   ать  лю           спать
SFX Y   ать  ишь          жать
SFX Y   ать  ишь          спать
SFX Y   ать  ите          жать
SFX Y   ать  ите          спать
SFX Y   ать  ит           жать
SFX Y   ать  ит           спать
SFX Y   ать  им           жать
SFX Y   ать  им           спать
SFX Y   ать  ешь          рвать
SFX Y   ать  ешь          осать
SFX Y   ать  ете          рвать
SFX Y   ать  ете          осать
SFX Y   ать  ет           рвать
SFX Y   ать  ет           осать
SFX Y   ать  ем           рвать
SFX Y   ать  ем           осать
SFX Y   ать  ёшь          рвать
SFX Y   ать  ёшь          осать
SFX Y   ать  ёте          рвать
SFX Y   ать  ёте          осать
SFX Y   ать  ёт           рвать
SFX Y   ать  ёт           осать
SFX Y   ать  ём           рвать
SFX Y   ать  ём           осать

SFX X Y 3
SFX X   ый   ы            нный
SFX X   ый   о            нный
SFX X   ый   а            нный

SFX W Y 28
SFX W   зиться жусь         зиться
SFX W   зить жу           зить
SFX W   ься  ся           иться
SFX W   ься  есь          иться
SFX W   ь    е            ить
SFX W   ться шься         иться
SFX W   ться мся          иться
SFX W   ть   шь           ить
SFX W   ть   т            ить
SFX W   ть   м            ить
SFX W   титься чусь         [^юаеиоясуыэч]титься
SFX W   тить чу           [^юаеиоясуыэч]тить
SFX W   ститься щусь         ститься
SFX W   стить щу           стить
SFX W   ситься шусь         ситься
SFX W   сить шу           сить
SFX W   иться усь          [жшщч]иться
SFX W   иться ятся         [^жшщч]иться
SFX W   иться люсь         [бфмпв]иться
SFX W   иться атся         [жшщч]иться
SFX W   иться юсь          [аелнору]иться
SFX W   ить  у            [жшщч]ить
SFX W   ить  ят           [^жшщч]ить
SFX W   ить  лю           [бфмпв]ить
SFX W   ить  ат           [жшщч]ить
SFX W   ить  ю            [аелнору]ить
SFX W   диться жусь         диться
SFX W   дить жу           дить
